North Carolina statutes. Chapter 164. Concerning the General Statutes of North Carolina.
Article 4. Sentencing Commission.
§ 164-42.
Sentencing structures. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Commission shall recommend structures for use by a sentencing court in determining the most appropriate sentence to be imposed in a criminal case, including:

Imposition of an active term of imprisonment;

Imposition of a term of probation;

Suspension of a sentence to imprisonment and imposition of probation with conditions, including the appropriate probation option or options, including house arrest, regular probation, intensive supervision, restitution, and community service;

Based upon the combination of offense and defendant characteristics in each case, the presumptively appropriate length of a term of probation, or a term of imprisonment;

Ordering multiple sentences to terms of imprisonment to run concurrently or consecutively;

For a sentence to probation without a suspended sentence to imprisonment, the maximum term of confinement to be imposed if the defendant violates the conditions of probation.

The sentencing structures shall be consistent with the goals, policies, and purposes of the criminal justice and corrections systems, as set forth in Sections 2 and 3 of the Sentencing and Policy Advisory Commission Act of 1990. As part of its work, the Commission shall offer recommendations for the incorporation of those sections into the sentencing laws of North Carolina. In formulating structures, the Commission also shall consider:

The nature and characteristics of the offense;

The severity of the offense in relation to other offenses;

The characteristics of the defendant that mitigate or aggravate the seriousness of his criminal conduct and the punishment deserved therefor;

The defendant’s number of prior convictions;

The available resources and constitutional capacity of the Division of Prisons, local confinement facilities, and community-based sanctions;

The rights of the victims;

That felony offenders sentenced to an active term of imprisonment, or whose suspended sentence to imprisonment is activated, should serve a designated minimum percentage of their sentences before they are eligible for parole; and

That misdemeanor offenders sentenced to an active term of imprisonment, or whose suspended sentence to imprisonment is activated, should serve a designated minimum percentage of their sentence before they are eligible for parole.

The Commission shall also consider the policy issues set forth in

G.S. 164-42.1

in developing its sentencing structures.

The Commission shall include with each set of sentencing structures a statement of its estimate of the effect of the sentencing structures on the Division of Prisons and local facilities, both in terms of fiscal impact and on inmate population. If the Commission finds that the proposed sentencing structures will result in inmate populations in the Division of Prisons and local confinement facilities that exceed the standard operating capacity, then the Commission shall present an additional set of structures that are consistent with that capacity. For purposes of this subsection, “standard operating capacity” means the total capacity expected to be available in both local confinement facilities and in the Division of Prisons once all the proceeds of bonds authorized by Chapter 933 of the 1989 Session Laws and Chapter 935 of the 1989 Session Laws have been expended for the construction of prison facilities.

History.

1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1076, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 812, s. 12; c. 816, ss. 1, 5; 1993, c. 253, s. 5.1; c. 321, s. 200.1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 591, s. 6(a); 1995, c. 236, s. 1; 1997-256, s. 6; 1997-347, s. 2; 1997-401, s. 2; 1997-418, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 18.6(a); 2009-372, s. 8; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2011-391, s. 43(f); 2017-186, s. 2(nnnnnnnnn); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(q).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 164-42

.

Cross References.

As to legislation regarding blended sentencing, see the editor’s note at

G.S. 7B-2500

.

Editor’s Note.

For the text of sections 2 and 3 of the Sentencing and Policy Advisory Commission Act of 1990, Session Laws 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), see c. 1076, ss. 2 and 3.

Session Laws 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 816, which amended this section, in s. 6, provides: “Nothing in this act shall be construed to obligate the General Assembly to appropriate funds to implement the provisions of this act.”

Session Laws
2011-145, s. 19.1(h), provides, in part: “In any other instances in which the term ‘Department of Correction’ appears in the General Statutes, the Revisor of Statutes shall replace ‘Department of Correction’ with ‘Division of Adult Correction’, and in any other instances in which the word ‘Department’ is used to refer to the Department of Correction, the Revisor of Statutes shall delete the word ‘Department’ and substitute the word ‘Division’. ” Pursuant to that authority, the Revisor of Statutes has directed that “Division of Adult Correction” be substituted for “Department of Correction” throughout this section.

Session Laws
2011-145, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2011.’ ”

Session Laws
2011-145, s. 32.5, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2011-391, s. 43(f), effective July 1, 2011, amended Session Laws
2011-145, s. 19(h), by deleting “164-42” from the list of sections. The amendment to this section by Session Laws
2011-145, s. 19.1(h), which would have substituted “Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety” for “Department of Correction” effective January 1, 2012, never took effect.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(q), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-372, s. 8, effective December 1, 2009, and applicable to offenses committed on or after that date, substituted “supervision” for “probation” near the end of subdivision (a)(4).

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(nnnnnnnnn), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” throughout the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(q), substituted “Division of Prisons” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice” in subdivision (b)(5) and throughout subsection (d). For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 164-42.1.
Policy recommendations.

Using the studies of the Special Committee on Prisons, the Governor’s Crime Commission, and other analyses, including testimony from representatives of the bodies that conducted the analyses, the Commission shall:

Determine the long-range needs of the criminal justice and corrections systems and recommend policy priorities for those systems;

Determine the long-range information needs of the criminal justice and corrections systems and acquire that information as it becomes available;

Identify critical problems in the criminal justice and corrections systems and recommend strategies to solve those problems;

Assess the cost-effectiveness of the use of State and local funds in the criminal justice and corrections systems;

Recommend the goals, priorities, and standards for the allocation of criminal justice and corrections funds;

Recommend means to improve the deterrent and rehabilitative capabilities of the criminal justice and corrections systems;

Propose plans, programs, and legislation for improving the effectiveness of the criminal justice and corrections systems;

Determine the sentencing structures for parole decisions;

Examine the impact of mandatory sentence lengths as opposed to the deterrent effect of minimum mandatory terms of imprisonment;

Examine good time and gain time practices;

Study the value of presentence reports;

Consider the rehabilitative potential of the offender and the appropriate rehabilitative placement;

Examine the impact of imprisonment on families of offenders;

Examine the impact of imprisonment on the ability of the offender to make restitution;

Study the need for an amendment to Article XI, Section 1 of the State Constitution to include restitution, restraints on liberty, work programs, or other punishments to the list of punishments allowed under that section; and

Study the costs and consequences of criminal behavior in North Carolina and consider the value of preventing crimes by using incarceration to deter both prospective criminals and convicted criminals from future crimes.

Using the studies and analyses available, including testimony from representatives of the bodies that conducted the analyses, the Commission shall:

Determine the long-range needs of the juvenile justice system and recommend policy priorities for that system;

Determine the long-range information needs of the juvenile justice system and acquire that information as it becomes available;

Identify critical problems in the juvenile justice system and recommend strategies to solve those problems;

Assess the cost-effectiveness of the use of State and local funds in the juvenile justice system; and

Recommend the goals, priorities, and standards for the allocation of juvenile justice funds.

History.

1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1076, s. 1; 1993, c. 253, s. 5.1; c. 321, s. 200.1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 591, s. 6(a); 1995, c. 236, s. 1; 1997-256, s. 6; 1997-347, s. 2; 1997-401, s. 2; 1997-418, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 18.6(a); 1998-202, s. 10(c).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2004-124, s. 16.5, provides: “Pursuant to

G.S. 164-42.1

and

G.S. 164-43

, the North Carolina Sentencing and Policy Advisory Commission shall prepare biennial reports on juvenile recidivism in North Carolina. The Commission shall consult with the Department of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention [now the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety] and the Fiscal Research Division of the Legislative Services Office of the General Assembly in developing a methodology for measuring juvenile recidivism in North Carolina. The Commission shall report the proposed methodology to the 2005 General Assembly by March 1, 2005. The Commission’s report shall also include a timeline for completing the initial analysis and recidivism report and any proposed legislation regarding juvenile recidivism. The report shall also include recommendations for other outcome measures that are appropriate for evaluating juvenile program effectiveness.”

Session Laws 2004-124, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2004’.”

Session Laws 2004-124, s. 33.3, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2004-2005 fiscal year, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2004-2005 fiscal year.”

Session Laws 2004-124, s. 33.5, is a severability clause.

§ 164-42.2.
Community corrections.

The Commission shall recommend a comprehensive community corrections strategy and organizational structure for the State based upon the following:

A review of existing community-based corrections programs in the State;

The identification of additional types of community corrections programs, including residential programs, necessary to create an effective continuum of corrections sanctions in North Carolina;

The identification of categories of offenders who would be eligible for sentencing to community corrections programs and the impact that the use of a comprehensive range of community-based sanctions would have on sentencing practices;

A form of State oversight and coordination to ensure that community corrections programs are coordinated in order to achieve maximum impact; and

A mechanism for State funding and local community participation in the operation and implementation of community corrections programs;

An analysis of the rate of recidivism of clients under the supervision of the existing community-based corrections programs in the State, recidivism here measured as the clients committing new crimes at any time subsequent to their entry into a community-based corrections program.

History.

1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1076, s. 1; 1993, c. 253, s. 5.1; c. 321, s. 200.1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 591, s. 6(a); 1995, c. 236, s. 1; 1997-256, s. 6; 1997-347, s. 2; 1997-401, s. 2; 1997-418, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 18.6(a).

Editor’s Note.

The subdivisions of this section were enacted as subdivisions (a) to (f) by Session Laws 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1076, s. 1, and redesignated as subdivisions (1) to (6) at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

§ 164-43.
Priority of duties; reports; continuing duties. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Commission shall have two primary duties, and other secondary duties essential to accomplishing the primary ones. The Commission may establish subcommittees or advisory committees composed of Commission members to accomplish duties imposed by this Article.It is the legislative intent that the Commission attach priority to accomplish the following primary duties:

The classification of criminal offenses as described in

G.S. 164-41

and the formulation of sentencing structures as described in

G.S. 164-42

; and

The formulation of proposals and recommendations as described in

G.S. 164-42

.1 and

G.S. 164-42.2

.

The Commission shall report its findings and recommendations to the 1991 General Assembly, 1991 Regular Session. The report shall describe the status of the Commission’s work, and shall include any completed policy recommendations.

The Commission shall report on its progress in formulating recommendations for the classification and ranges of punishment for felonies and misdemeanors, required by

G.S. 164-41

, and sentencing structures, established under

G.S. 164-42

, to the 1991 General Assembly, 1992 Regular Session, and shall make a final report on these recommendations no later than 30 days after the convening of the 1993 Session of the General Assembly.

Once the primary duties of the Commission have been accomplished, it shall have the continuing duty to monitor and review the criminal justice and corrections systems and the juvenile justice system in this State to ensure that sentences and dispositions remain uniform and consistent, and that the goals and policies established by the State are being implemented by sentencing and dispositional practices, and it shall recommend methods by which this ongoing work may be accomplished and by which the correctional population simulation model and the Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety facilities population simulation model developed under

G.S. 164-40

shall continue to be used by the State.

Upon adoption of a system for the classification of offenses formulated under

G.S. 164-41

, the Commission or its successor shall review all proposed legislation which creates a new criminal offense, changes the classification of an offense, or changes the range of punishment or dispositional level for a particular classification, and shall make recommendations to the General Assembly.

In the case of a new criminal offense, the Commission or its successor shall determine whether the proposal places the offense in the correct classification, based upon the considerations and principles set out in

G.S. 164-41

. If the proposal does not assign the offense to a classification, it shall be the duty of the Commission or its successor to recommend the proper classification placement.

In the case of proposed changes in the classification of an offense or changes in the range of punishment or dispositional level for a classification, the Commission or its successor shall determine whether such a proposed change is consistent with the considerations and principles set out in

G.S. 164-41

, and shall report its findings to the General Assembly.

The Commission or its successor shall meet within 10 days after the last day for filing general bills in the General Assembly for the purpose of reviewing bills as described in subsections (e), (f), and (g). The Commission or its successor shall include in its report on a bill an analysis based on an application of the correctional population simulation model or the Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety facilities population simulation model to the provisions of the bill.

History.

1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1076, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 812, s. 12; c. 816, ss. 1, 4; 1993, c. 253, s. 5.1; c. 321, s. 200.1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 591, s. 6(a); 1995, c. 236, s. 1; 1997-256, s. 6; 1997-347, s. 2; 1997-401, s. 2; 1997-418, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 18.6(a); 1998-202, s. 10(d); 2000-137, s. 4(jj); 2011-145, s. 19.1(l); 2017-186, s. 2(ooooooooo).

Section Set out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 164-43

.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 816, which amended this section, in s. 6, provides: “Nothing in this act shall be construed to obligate the General Assembly to appropriate funds to implement the provisions of this act.”

Session Laws
2004-124, s. 16.5, provides: “Pursuant to

G.S. 164-42.1

and

G.S. 164-43

, the North Carolina Sentencing and Policy Advisory Commission shall prepare biennial reports on juvenile recidivism in North Carolina. The Commission shall consult with the Department of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention [now the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety] and the Fiscal Research Division of the Legislative Services Office of the General Assembly in developing a methodology for measuring juvenile recidivism in North Carolina. The Commission shall report the proposed methodology to the 2005 General Assembly by March 1, 2005. The Commission’s report shall also include a timeline for completing the initial analysis and recidivism report and any proposed legislation regarding juvenile recidivism. The report shall also include recommendations for other outcome measures that are appropriate for evaluating juvenile program effectiveness.”

Session Laws
2004-124, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2004’.”

Session Laws
2004-124, s. 33.3, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2004-2005 fiscal year, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2004-2005 fiscal year.”

Session Laws
2004-124, s. 33.5, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(
l
), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” for “Department of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention” in subsections (d) and (h).

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(ooooooooo), effective December 1, 2017, substituted “Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and” for “Division of” in subsections (d) and (h).

§ 164-43.
Priority of duties; reports; continuing duties. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Commission shall have two primary duties, and other secondary duties essential to accomplishing the primary ones. The Commission may establish subcommittees or advisory committees composed of Commission members to accomplish duties imposed by this Article.It is the legislative intent that the Commission attach priority to accomplish the following primary duties:

The classification of criminal offenses as described in

G.S. 164-41

and the formulation of sentencing structures as described in

G.S. 164-42

; and

The formulation of proposals and recommendations as described in

G.S. 164-42

.1 and

G.S. 164-42.2

.

The Commission shall report its findings and recommendations to the 1991 General Assembly, 1991 Regular Session. The report shall describe the status of the Commission’s work, and shall include any completed policy recommendations.

The Commission shall report on its progress in formulating recommendations for the classification and ranges of punishment for felonies and misdemeanors, required by

G.S. 164-41

, and sentencing structures, established under

G.S. 164-42

, to the 1991 General Assembly, 1992 Regular Session, and shall make a final report on these recommendations no later than 30 days after the convening of the 1993 Session of the General Assembly.

Once the primary duties of the Commission have been accomplished, it shall have the continuing duty to monitor and review the criminal justice and corrections systems and the juvenile justice system in this State to ensure that sentences and dispositions remain uniform and consistent, and that the goals and policies established by the State are being implemented by sentencing and dispositional practices, and it shall recommend methods by which this ongoing work may be accomplished and by which the correctional population simulation model and the juvenile justice facilities population simulation model developed under

G.S. 164-40

shall continue to be used by the State.

Upon adoption of a system for the classification of offenses formulated under

G.S. 164-41

, the Commission or its successor shall review all proposed legislation which creates a new criminal offense, changes the classification of an offense, or changes the range of punishment or dispositional level for a particular classification, and shall make recommendations to the General Assembly.

In the case of a new criminal offense, the Commission or its successor shall determine whether the proposal places the offense in the correct classification, based upon the considerations and principles set out in

G.S. 164-41

. If the proposal does not assign the offense to a classification, it shall be the duty of the Commission or its successor to recommend the proper classification placement.

In the case of proposed changes in the classification of an offense or changes in the range of punishment or dispositional level for a classification, the Commission or its successor shall determine whether such a proposed change is consistent with the considerations and principles set out in

G.S. 164-41

, and shall report its findings to the General Assembly.

The Commission or its successor shall meet within 10 days after the last day for filing general bills in the General Assembly for the purpose of reviewing bills as described in subsections (e), (f), and (g). The Commission or its successor shall include in its report on a bill an analysis based on an application of the correctional population simulation model or the juvenile justice facilities population simulation model to the provisions of the bill.”

History.

1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1076, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 812, s. 12; c. 816, ss. 1, 4; 1993, c. 253, s. 5.1; c. 321, s. 200.1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 591, s. 6(a); 1995, c. 236, s. 1; 1997-256, s. 6; 1997-347, s. 2; 1997-401, s. 2; 1997-418, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 18.6(a); 1998-202, s. 10(d); 2000-137, s. 4(jj); 2011-145, s. 19.1(l); 2017-186, s. 2(ooooooooo); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(tttt).

Section Set out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 164-43

.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 816, which amended this section, in s. 6, provides: “Nothing in this act shall be construed to obligate the General Assembly to appropriate funds to implement the provisions of this act.”

Session Laws
2004-124, s. 16.5, provides: “Pursuant to

G.S. 164-42.1

and

G.S. 164-43

, the North Carolina Sentencing and Policy Advisory Commission shall prepare biennial reports on juvenile recidivism in North Carolina. The Commission shall consult with the Department of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention [now the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety] and the Fiscal Research Division of the Legislative Services Office of the General Assembly in developing a methodology for measuring juvenile recidivism in North Carolina. The Commission shall report the proposed methodology to the 2005 General Assembly by March 1, 2005. The Commission’s report shall also include a timeline for completing the initial analysis and recidivism report and any proposed legislation regarding juvenile recidivism. The report shall also include recommendations for other outcome measures that are appropriate for evaluating juvenile program effectiveness.”

Session Laws
2004-124, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2004’.”

Session Laws
2004-124, s. 33.3, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2004-2005 fiscal year, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2004-2005 fiscal year.”

Session Laws
2004-124, s. 33.5, is a severability clause.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to subsections (d) and (h) of this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(tttt), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(
l
), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” for “Department of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention” in subsections (d) and (h).

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(ooooooooo), effective December 1, 2017, substituted “Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and” for “Division of” in subsections (d) and (h).

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(tttt), in subsections (d) and (h), substituted “the juvenile justice facilities” for “the Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety facilities”. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 164-44.
Statistical information; financial or other aid.

The Commission shall have the secondary duty of collecting, developing, and maintaining statistical data relating to sentencing, corrections, and juvenile justice so that the primary duties of the Commission will be formulated using data that is valid, accurate, and relevant to this State. All State agencies shall provide data as it is requested by the Commission. For the purposes of G.S. 143B-930, the Commission shall be considered to be engaged in the administration of criminal justice. All meetings of the Commission shall be open to the public and the information presented to the Commission shall be available to any State agency or member of the General Assembly.

The Commission shall have the authority to apply for, accept, and use any gifts, grants, or financial or other aid, in any form, from the federal government or any agency or instrumentality thereof, or from the State or from any other source including private associations, foundations, or corporations to accomplish any of the duties set out in this Chapter.

History.

1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1076, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 812, s. 12; c. 816, s. 1; 1993, c. 253, s. 5.1; c. 321, s. 200.1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 591, s. 6(a); 1995, c. 236, s. 1; 1997-256, s. 6; 1997-347, s. 2; 1997-401, s. 2; 1997-418, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 18.6(a); 1998-202, s. 10(e); 2011-192, s. 8(b); 2014-100, s. 17.1(ooo).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2014.’ ”

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 38.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-192, s. 8(b), effective June 23, 2011, added the third sentence in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 17.1(ooo), effective July 1, 2014, substituted “G.S. 143B-930” for “G.S. 114-19.1” in the third sentence of subsection (a).

§ 164-45.
Administrative direction and supervision.

The Commission shall be administered under the direction and supervision of the Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts. The Commission shall exercise all of its prescribed statutory powers independently of the head of that Office, except that all management functions shall be performed under the direction and supervision of the Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts. “Management functions,” as used in this section, means planning, organizing, staffing, directing, coordinating, and budgeting.

History.

1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1076, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 812, s. 12; c. 816, s. 1; 1993, c. 253, s. 5.1; c. 321, s. 200.1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 591, s. 6(a); 1995, c. 236, s. 1; 1997-256, s. 6; 1997-347, s. 2; 1997-401, s. 2; 1997-418, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 18.6(a).

§ 164-46.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-212, s. 16.18(b), effective July 1, 1998.

§ 164-47.
Biennial Report on Recidivism. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Judicial Department, through the North Carolina Sentencing and Policy Advisory Commission, and the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety shall jointly conduct ongoing evaluations of community corrections programs and in-prison treatment programs and make a biennial report to the General Assembly. The report shall include composite measures of program effectiveness based on recidivism rates, other outcome measures, and costs of the programs.

During the 1998-99 fiscal year, the Sentencing and Policy Advisory Commission shall coordinate the collection of all data necessary to create an expanded database containing offender information on prior convictions, current conviction and sentence, program participation, and outcome measures. Each program to be evaluated shall assist the Commission in the development of systems and collection of data necessary to complete the evaluation process. The first evaluation report shall be presented to the Chairs of the Senate and House Appropriations Committees and the Chairs of the Senate and House Appropriations Subcommittees on Justice and Public Safety by April 15, 2000, and future reports shall be made by April 15 of each even-numbered year.

History.

1998-212, s. 16.18(a); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 2(ppppppppp).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 164-47

.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws
1998-212, s. 16.18(a), in part, was codified as this section at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety” for “Department of Correction” in the first sentence.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(ppppppppp), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in the first sentence of the first paragraph in the section.

§ 164-47.
Biennial Report on Recidivism. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Judicial Department, through the North Carolina Sentencing and Policy Advisory Commission, the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction, and the Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction shall jointly conduct ongoing evaluations of community corrections programs and in-prison treatment programs and make a biennial report to the General Assembly. The report shall include composite measures of program effectiveness based on recidivism rates, other outcome measures, and costs of the programs.

During the 1998-99 fiscal year, the Sentencing and Policy Advisory Commission shall coordinate the collection of all data necessary to create an expanded database containing offender information on prior convictions, current conviction and sentence, program participation, and outcome measures. Each program to be evaluated shall assist the Commission in the development of systems and collection of data necessary to complete the evaluation process. The first evaluation report shall be presented to the Chairs of the Senate and House Appropriations Committees and the Chairs of the Senate and House Appropriations Subcommittees on Justice and Public Safety by April 15, 2000, and future reports shall be made by April 15 of each even-numbered year.

History.

1998-212, s. 16.18(a); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 2(ppppppppp); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(uuuu).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 164-47

.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws
1998-212, s. 16.18(a), in part, was codified as this section at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(uuuu), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety” for “Department of Correction” in the first sentence.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(ppppppppp), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in the first sentence of the first paragraph in the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(uuuu), in the first sentence of the first paragraph, inserted “the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction,”, and substituted “Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety”. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 164-48.
Biennial report on juvenile recidivism.

The Judicial Department, through the North Carolina Sentencing and Policy Advisory Commission, shall conduct biennial recidivism studies of juveniles in North Carolina. Each study shall be based upon a sample of juveniles adjudicated delinquent and document subsequent involvement in both the juvenile justice system and criminal justice system for at least two years following the sample adjudication. All State agencies shall provide data as requested by the Commission.

The Sentencing and Policy Advisory Commission shall report the results of the first recidivism study to the Chairs of the Senate and House of Representatives Appropriations Committees and the Chairs of the Senate and House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittees on Justice and Public Safety by May 1, 2007, and future reports shall be made by May 1 of each odd-numbered year.

History.

2005-276, s. 14.19(a).

§ 164-49.
Biennial report on effectiveness of JCPC grant recipients.

The Judicial Department, through the North Carolina Sentencing and Policy Advisory Commission, shall conduct biennial studies on the effectiveness of programs receiving Juvenile Crime Prevention Council grant funding in North Carolina. Each study shall be based upon a sample of juveniles admitted to programs funded with JCPC grants and document subsequent involvement in both the juvenile justice system and criminal justice system for at least two years following the sample admittance. All State agencies shall provide data as requested by the Commission.

The Sentencing and Policy Advisory Commission shall report the results of the first effectiveness study to the Chairs of the Senate and House of Representatives Appropriations Committees and the Chairs of the Senate and House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittees on Justice and Public Safety by May 1, 2011, and future reports shall be made by May 1 of each odd-numbered year.

History.

2009-451, s. 15.17J.